Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF901.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 340A.412, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 12a. new text end new text begin Transfers of wine. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision 12, the holder of an off-sale intoxicating liquor license may transfer wine from one licensed premises to another provided that: new text end new text begin (1) the license for the transferring and receiving premises are held by the same licensee; new text end new text begin (2) the licensee notifies the wholesaler from whom the wine was purchased and the Division of Alcohol and Gambling Enforcement of the Division of Public Safety, in writing, of the transfer; and new text end new text begin (3) only one transfer is made from a licensed premises in a three-month period. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end